Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-43] Summary courts-martial of state
military forces not in federal service; who may convene. (a) In the state
military forces not in federal service, the commanding officer of a garrison,
fort, post, camp, air base, auxiliary air base, or other place where troops are
on duty, or of a brigade, regiment, wing, group, detached battalion, detached
squadron, detached company, or other detachment, may convene a summary
court-martial consisting of one commissioned officer. The proceedings shall be
informal.

(b) When only one commissioned officer is
present with a command or detachment the officer shall be the summary
court-martial of that command or detachment and shall hear and determine all
summary court-martial cases brought before the officer. Summary courts-martial
may, however, be convened in any case by superior competent authority when
considered desirable by the superior authority. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen
ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next